Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
Allocation of Supplementary State Funds

39.480.
Allocation of state funds. [Repealed.]

39.481.
Purpose of supplementary state fund. [Repealed.]

39.482.
State officers and their duties — Funds to local units. [Repealed.]

39.483.
Criteria for funding local disaster and emergency services organizations. [Repealed.]

39.484.
Request for financial aid — Review and evaluation criteria. [Repealed.]

39.485.
Reimbursement — Claims and equipment purchase. [Repealed.]

39.486.
Performance evaluation — Appeal process. [Repealed.]

39.487.
Requests for waiver of requirements. [Repealed.]

39.490.
Administration of supplementary state funding — Power to make rules and regulations. [Repealed.]

39.600.
Unit of Civil Air Patrol. [Repealed.]

39.610.
Functions of unit. [Repealed.]

39.620.
Coordination with federal government. [Repealed.]

39.630.
Restrictions on use of appropriated funds. [Repealed.]